test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VINIT_izhichigewin_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     izhichigewin: izhichigewin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1izhichigewin: niizhichigewin
     +Px2izhichigewin: giizhichigewin
     +Px3izhichigewin: oizhichigewin
     +PxIndefizhichigewin: iizhichigewin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     izhichigewin+Dim: izhichigewinens
     izhichigewin+Con: izhichigewinenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     izhichigewin+Pos: izhichigewinim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     izhichigewin+Pej: izhichigewinish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     izhichigewin+Pos1Pl: izhichigewininaan
     izhichigewin+PosPl: izhichigewiniwaa
     izhichigewin+PosObv: izhichigewinini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     izhichigewin+Pret: izhichigewiniban
     izhichigewin+VocPl: izhichigewin***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     izhichigewin+Obv: izhichigewinan
     izhichigewin+Pl: izhichigewinag
     izhichigewin+Loc: izhichigewining
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1izhichigewin+Dim: niizhichigewinens
     +Px1izhichigewin+Con: niizhichigewinenh
     +Px2izhichigewin+Dim: giizhichigewinens
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con: giizhichigewinenh
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim: oizhichigewinens
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con: oizhichigewinenh
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim: iizhichigewinens
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con: iizhichigewinenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pos: niizhichigewinim
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pos: giizhichigewinim
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos: oizhichigewinim
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos: iizhichigewinim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej: niizhichigewinish
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej: giizhichigewinish
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej: oizhichigewinish
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej: iizhichigewinish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pos1Pl: niizhichigewininaan
     +Px1izhichigewin+PosPl: niizhichigewiniwaa
     +Px1izhichigewin+PosObv: niizhichigewinini
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pos1Pl: giizhichigewininaan
     +Px2izhichigewin+PosPl: giizhichigewiniwaa
     +Px2izhichigewin+PosObv: giizhichigewinini
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos1Pl: oizhichigewininaan
     +Px3izhichigewin+PosPl: oizhichigewiniwaa
     +Px3izhichigewin+PosObv: oizhichigewinini
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos1Pl: iizhichigewininaan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+PosPl: iizhichigewiniwaa
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+PosObv: iizhichigewinini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pret: niizhichigewiniban
     +Px1izhichigewin+VocPl: niizhichigewin***idig, idog***
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pret: giizhichigewiniban
     +Px2izhichigewin+VocPl: giizhichigewin***idig, idog***
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pret: oizhichigewiniban
     +Px3izhichigewin+VocPl: oizhichigewin***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pret: iizhichigewiniban
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+VocPl: iizhichigewin***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1izhichigewin+Obv: niizhichigewinan
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pl: niizhichigewinag
     +Px1izhichigewin+Loc: niizhichigewining
     +Px2izhichigewin+Obv: giizhichigewinan
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pl: giizhichigewinag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Loc: giizhichigewining
     +Px3izhichigewin+Obv: oizhichigewinan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pl: oizhichigewinag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Loc: oizhichigewining
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Obv: iizhichigewinan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pl: iizhichigewinag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Loc: iizhichigewining
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos: izhichigewinensim
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos: izhichigewinenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pej: izhichigewinensish
     izhichigewin+Con+Pej: izhichigewinenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos1Pl: izhichigewinensinaan
     izhichigewin+Dim+PosPl: izhichigewinensiwaa
     izhichigewin+Dim+PosObv: izhichigewinensini
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos1Pl: izhichigewinenhinaan
     izhichigewin+Con+PosPl: izhichigewinenhiwaa
     izhichigewin+Con+PosObv: izhichigewinenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pret: izhichigewinensiban
     izhichigewin+Dim+VocPl: izhichigewinens***idig, idog***
     izhichigewin+Con+Pret: izhichigewinenhiban
     izhichigewin+Con+VocPl: izhichigewinenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     izhichigewin+Dim+Obv: izhichigewinensan
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pl: izhichigewinensag
     izhichigewin+Dim+Loc: izhichigewinensing
     izhichigewin+Con+Obv: izhichigewinenhan
     izhichigewin+Con+Pl: izhichigewinenhag
     izhichigewin+Con+Loc: izhichigewinenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pej: izhichigewinimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl: izhichigewiniminaan
     izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl: izhichigewinimiwaa
     izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv: izhichigewinimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pret: izhichigewinimiban
     izhichigewin+Pos+VocPl: izhichigewinim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     izhichigewin+Pos+Obv: izhichigewiniman
     izhichigewin+Pos+Pl: izhichigewinimag
     izhichigewin+Pos+Loc: izhichigewiniming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl: izhichigewinishinaan
     izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl: izhichigewinishiwaa
     izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv: izhichigewinishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     izhichigewin+Pej+Pret: izhichigewinishiban
     izhichigewin+Pej+VocPl: izhichigewinish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     izhichigewin+Pej+Obv: izhichigewinishan
     izhichigewin+Pej+Pl: izhichigewinishag
     izhichigewin+Pej+Loc: izhichigewinishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     izhichigewin+Pos1Pl+Pret: izhichigewininaaniban
     izhichigewin+Pos1Pl+VocPl: izhichigewininaan***idig, idog***
     izhichigewin+PosPl+Pret: izhichigewiniwaaiban
     izhichigewin+PosPl+VocPl: izhichigewiniwaa***idig, idog***
     izhichigewin+PosObv+Pret: izhichigewininiiban
     izhichigewin+PosObv+VocPl: izhichigewinini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     izhichigewin+Pos1Pl+Obv: izhichigewininaanan
     izhichigewin+Pos1Pl+Pl: izhichigewininaanag
     izhichigewin+Pos1Pl+Loc: izhichigewininaaning
     izhichigewin+PosPl+Obv: izhichigewiniwaaan
     izhichigewin+PosPl+Pl: izhichigewiniwaaag
     izhichigewin+PosPl+Loc: izhichigewiniwaaing
     izhichigewin+PosObv+Obv: izhichigewininian
     izhichigewin+PosObv+Pl: izhichigewininiag
     izhichigewin+PosObv+Loc: izhichigewininiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     izhichigewin+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinibanan
     izhichigewin+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinibanag
     izhichigewin+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinibaning
     izhichigewin+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewin***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewin***idig, idog***ag
     izhichigewin+VocPl+Loc: izhichigewin***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1izhichigewin+Dim+Pos: niizhichigewinensim
     +Px1izhichigewin+Con+Pos: niizhichigewinenhim
     +Px2izhichigewin+Dim+Pos: giizhichigewinensim
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos: giizhichigewinenhim
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos: oizhichigewinensim
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos: oizhichigewinenhim
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos: iizhichigewinensim
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos: iizhichigewinenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1izhichigewin+Dim+Pej: niizhichigewinensish
     +Px1izhichigewin+Con+Pej: niizhichigewinenhish
     +Px2izhichigewin+Dim+Pej: giizhichigewinensish
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pej: giizhichigewinenhish
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pej: oizhichigewinensish
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pej: oizhichigewinenhish
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pej: iizhichigewinensish
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pej: iizhichigewinenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1izhichigewin+Dim+Pos1Pl: niizhichigewinensinaan
     +Px1izhichigewin+Dim+PosPl: niizhichigewinensiwaa
     +Px1izhichigewin+Dim+PosObv: niizhichigewinensini
     +Px1izhichigewin+Con+Pos1Pl: niizhichigewinenhinaan
     +Px1izhichigewin+Con+PosPl: niizhichigewinenhiwaa
     +Px1izhichigewin+Con+PosObv: niizhichigewinenhini
     +Px2izhichigewin+Dim+Pos1Pl: giizhichigewinensinaan
     +Px2izhichigewin+Dim+PosPl: giizhichigewinensiwaa
     +Px2izhichigewin+Dim+PosObv: giizhichigewinensini
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos1Pl: giizhichigewinenhinaan
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+PosPl: giizhichigewinenhiwaa
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+PosObv: giizhichigewinenhini
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos1Pl: oizhichigewinensinaan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+PosPl: oizhichigewinensiwaa
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+PosObv: oizhichigewinensini
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos1Pl: oizhichigewinenhinaan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+PosPl: oizhichigewinenhiwaa
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+PosObv: oizhichigewinenhini
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos1Pl: iizhichigewinensinaan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+PosPl: iizhichigewinensiwaa
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+PosObv: iizhichigewinensini
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos1Pl: iizhichigewinenhinaan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+PosPl: iizhichigewinenhiwaa
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+PosObv: iizhichigewinenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1izhichigewin+Dim+Pret: niizhichigewinensiban
     +Px1izhichigewin+Dim+VocPl: niizhichigewinens***idig, idog***
     +Px1izhichigewin+Con+Pret: niizhichigewinenhiban
     +Px1izhichigewin+Con+VocPl: niizhichigewinenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2izhichigewin+Dim+Pret: giizhichigewinensiban
     +Px2izhichigewin+Dim+VocPl: giizhichigewinens***idig, idog***
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pret: giizhichigewinenhiban
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+VocPl: giizhichigewinenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pret: oizhichigewinensiban
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+VocPl: oizhichigewinens***idig, idog***
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pret: oizhichigewinenhiban
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+VocPl: oizhichigewinenh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pret: iizhichigewinensiban
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+VocPl: iizhichigewinens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pret: iizhichigewinenhiban
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+VocPl: iizhichigewinenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1izhichigewin+Dim+Obv: niizhichigewinensan
     +Px1izhichigewin+Dim+Pl: niizhichigewinensag
     +Px1izhichigewin+Dim+Loc: niizhichigewinensing
     +Px1izhichigewin+Con+Obv: niizhichigewinenhan
     +Px1izhichigewin+Con+Pl: niizhichigewinenhag
     +Px1izhichigewin+Con+Loc: niizhichigewinenhing
     +Px2izhichigewin+Dim+Obv: giizhichigewinensan
     +Px2izhichigewin+Dim+Pl: giizhichigewinensag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Dim+Loc: giizhichigewinensing
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Obv: giizhichigewinenhan
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pl: giizhichigewinenhag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Loc: giizhichigewinenhing
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Obv: oizhichigewinensan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pl: oizhichigewinensag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Loc: oizhichigewinensing
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Obv: oizhichigewinenhan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pl: oizhichigewinenhag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Loc: oizhichigewinenhing
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Obv: iizhichigewinensan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pl: iizhichigewinensag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Loc: iizhichigewinensing
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Obv: iizhichigewinenhan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pl: iizhichigewinenhag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Loc: iizhichigewinenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pos+Pej: niizhichigewinimish
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pos+Pej: giizhichigewinimish
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+Pej: oizhichigewinimish
